Utah statutes.
10-8-86.   Organization, operation, maintenance, and funding of system for
public transit authorized.
(1)  The governing body of any municipality may adopt a resolution allowing
the municipality to organize, operate, and maintain a system for public
transit within the municipality and to impose a sales and a use tax to fund
the system for public transit as provided in Section 59-12-2213.
(2)  The authority granted municipalities by this section to organize,
operate, and maintain a system for public transit is inapplicable to a
municipality located in or within five highway or roadway miles of the
boundary of an existing transit district, unless the existing transit district
consents to the organization and operation of the system for public transit by
the municipality.
